Massachusetts, session 194th, H2727.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 41 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 98H the following section:-
Section 98I. (a) Each city, town or district police department and fire department shall
keep a daily log of all responses to calls for assistance relating to an opiate overdose, which shall
include the name of the person experiencing the overdose, their home address, the address to
which the department responded to the call, and whether or not the overdose was fatal. All such
daily logs shall be recorded in a central database, and shall be accessible to all city, town or
district police departments and fire departments.
of 2

(c) Daily logs developed pursuant to this section shall not be public records nor shall the
information contained in such logs be disclosed to the public. Further, such information shall
only be accessed by police department and fire department personnel, and shall be used to
monitor overdose responses and fatalities, and to provide updated information for departments
carrying out overdose follow-up visits.
(d) Any police department or fire department personnel carrying out overdose follow-up
visits shall routinely check the database for any updated information prior to any follow-up visit.
(e) The department of public safety and security shall consider input from city, town and
district police departments and fire departments, and shall promulgate regulations regarding the
central database and information sharing, and said regulations shall be in compliance with any
federal standards for protecting personal health information.
of 2